South Dakota, session 2026, HB1142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 15-6:
Except as provided in section 2 of this Act, in any civil action, a party or the party's
counsel of record shall:
(1) Disclose in writing to the court and all other named parties to the civil action the
identity of any person, other than the counsel of record, that has the right to
receive any payment or thing of value that is contingent upon the outcome of the
civil action, or a group of actions of which the civil action is a part; and
(2) Produce to the court and all other named parties to the civil action, for inspection
and copying, any agreement creating a contingent right as described in subdivision
(1), including any ancillary agreement or document, except as otherwise stipulated
or ordered by the court.
Disclosure and production under this section must be made within ten days of the
execution of any agreement described in subdivision (2), or at the time of the filing of the
action before the court, whichever is later.
For purposes of this section, "person" includes associations, cooperative
corporations, corporations, domestic government entities, foreign government entities,
limited liability companies, natural persons, and partnerships.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 15-6:
Section 1 of this Act does not apply to any right to receive a payment if the payment
is solely:
(1) The repayment of principal of a loan;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.749.15 2 1142
(2) The repayment of principal of a loan plus interest that does not exceed the higher
of:
(a) Seven percent; or
(b) A rate two times the annual average thirty-year constant maturity Treasury
yield, as published by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve
system, for the twelve-month period preceding the date on which the
relevant agreement was executed; or
(3) The reimbursement of attorney fees, including the payment of a contingent fee to
an attorney for legal services pursuant to an attorney-client agreement.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 15-6:
The party filing the disclosure or production pursuant to section 1 of this Act, or
the party's counsel of record, must correct or supplement any disclosure or production
required by section 1 of this Act in a timely manner, upon learning that the disclosure or
production is or has become incomplete or incorrect in some material respect, if the
corrective or additional information has not otherwise been made to the other parties
during the discovery process or in writing, or as ordered by the court.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 15-6:
Nothing in sections 1 to 3, inclusive, of this Act prohibits a party in a civil action
from seeking information referred to in sections 1 and 2 of this Act through the discovery
process.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.